California statutes. Public Contract Code
 is incomplete due to the failure of a subcontractor to timely submit the required information to the contractor, bidder, or other entity, the public agency or awarding body shall only withhold an amount equal to 150 percent of the value of the monthly billing for the relevant subcontractor. If a public agency or other awarding body withholds amounts pursuant to this subdivision, the contractor, bidder, or other entity shall be entitled to withhold the same amount from the subcontractor until the subcontractor provides the contractor, bidder, or other entity a complete report, and the public agency or awarding body subsequently pays the contractor, bidder, or other entity the withheld payments. If the contractor, bidder, or other entity substitutes a subcontractor pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) for failure to provide a complete report, and the contractor, bidder, or other entity
 replaces the subcontractor with one that provides an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete the contract or project, the public agency or awarding body shall immediately resume making payments to the contractor, bidder, or other entity, including all previously withheld payments.

(c) If a monthly report does not demonstrate compliance with this chapter, the public agency or other awarding body shall do all of the following:

(1) Withhold further payments until the contractor, bidder, or other entity provides a plan to achieve substantial compliance with this chapter, with respect to the relevant apprenticeable occupation, prior to completion of the contract or project. All of the following shall apply to the withholding of payments
 under this paragraph:

(A) The public agency or awarding body shall withhold an amount equal to 150 percent of the value of the monthly billing for the entity that failed to comply with this chapter, or 150 percent of the value of the monthly billing for the subcontractor that failed to comply with this chapter. If a public agency or other awarding body withholds amounts pursuant to this paragraph, the contractor,
 bidder, or other entity shall be entitled to withhold the same amount from the subcontractor that did not demonstrate compliance with this chapter.

(B) If the contractor, bidder, or other entity substitutes a subcontractor pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) for failure to demonstrate compliance, and the contractor, bidder, or other entity replaces the subcontractor with one that provides an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete the contract or project, the public agency or awarding body shall immediately resume making payments to the contractor, bidder, or other entity, including all previously withheld payments.

(C) If a contractor, bidder, or other entity submits to the public agency or
 awarding body a plan to achieve substantial compliance with this chapter, the public agency or awarding body shall immediately resume making payments to the contractor, bidder, or other entity, including all previously withheld payments unless, within a reasonable time, the public agency or awarding body rejects the plan as insufficient and explains the reasons for the rejection.

(2) Forward a copy of the monthly report to the Labor Commissioner for issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment in accordance with Section 2603.

(3) Forward to the Labor Commissioner a copy of the plan, if any, submitted by the contractor, bidder, or other entity to achieve substantial compliance with this chapter and the response to that plan, if any, by the public agency or awarding body.

(d) A monthly report provided to the public agency or other awarding body shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 882, Sec. 1.   (SB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

(a) If the Labor Commissioner or his or her designee determines after an investigation that a contractor or subcontractor failed to use a skilled and trained workforce in accordance with this chapter, the contractor or subcontractor responsible for the violation shall forfeit, as a civil penalty to the state, not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per month of work performed in violation of this chapter. A contractor or subcontractor that commits a second or subsequent violation within a three-year period shall forfeit as a civil penalty to the state the sum of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month of work performed in violation of this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Any interest” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (h) of Section 1777.1 of the Labor Code.

(2) “Contractor or subcontractor” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (g) of Section 1777.1 of the Labor Code.

(3) “Entity” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (i) of Section 1777.1 of the Labor Code.

(c) The amount of any monetary penalty may be reduced or waived by the Labor Commissioner if the amount of the penalty would be disproportionate to the severity of the violation. The Labor Commissioner shall consider, in setting the amount of a monetary penalty, all of the following
 circumstances:

(1) Whether the violation was intentional.

(2) Whether the contractor or subcontractor has committed other violations of this chapter or of the Labor Code.

(3) Whether, upon notice of the violation, the contractor or subcontractor took steps to voluntarily remedy the violation.

(4) The extent or severity of the violation.

(5) Whether a contractor or subcontractor submitted and followed a plan to achieve substantial compliance with this chapter.

(d) The Labor Commissioner or his or her designee shall issue a civil wage and penalty
 assessment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1741 of the Labor Code, upon determination of penalties assessed under subdivision (a). Review of a civil wage and penalty assessment issued under this subdivision may be requested in accordance with the provisions of Section 1742 of the Labor Code. The regulations of the Director of Industrial Relations, which govern proceedings for review of civil wage and penalty assessments and the withholding of contract payments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, shall apply.

(e) The determination of the Labor Commissioner as to the amount of the penalty imposed under subdivision (a) shall be reviewable by the Director of Industrial Relations only for an abuse of discretion.

(f) If a subcontractor is found to have violated this chapter, the prime contractor of the project is not liable for any penalties under subdivision (a) unless the prime contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to comply with this chapter or unless the prime contractor fails to comply with any of the following requirements:

(1) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2019, the contract executed between the contractor and the subcontractor for the performance of work on the project shall include a copy of this chapter.

(2) The contractor shall periodically monitor the subcontractor’s use of a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) Upon becoming aware of a failure of the subcontractor to use a skilled and trained workforce, the contractor shall take corrective action, including, but not limited to, retaining 150 percent of the amount due to the subcontractor for work performed on the project until the failure is corrected.

(4) Prior to making the final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the project, the contractor shall obtain a declaration signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has met the requirements of this chapter.

(g) The
 Labor Commissioner shall notify the prime contractor within 15 days of the receipt by the Labor Commissioner of a complaint that a subcontractor violated this chapter.

(h) Whenever a contractor or subcontractor is found by the Labor Commissioner to be in violation of this chapter with intent to defraud, the contractor or subcontractor or a firm, corporation, partnership, or association in which the contractor or subcontractor has any interest is ineligible for a period of not less than one year or more than three years to do either of the following:

(1) Bid on or be awarded a contract for a public works project.

(2) Perform work as a subcontractor on a public works project.

(i) Whenever a contractor or subcontractor is found by the Labor Commissioner to have committed two or more separate willful violations of this chapter within a three-year period, the contractor or subcontractor or a firm, corporation, partnership, or association in which the contractor or subcontractor has any interest is ineligible for a period of up to three years to do either of the following:

(1) Bid on or be awarded a contract for a public works project.

(2) Perform work as a subcontractor on a public works project.

(j) The debarment procedures adopted by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1777.1 of the Labor Code shall apply to any finding made under subdivisions (h) or (i) of this section.

(k) The Labor Commissioner shall publish on the commissioner’s Internet Web site a list of contractors who are ineligible to bid on or be awarded a public works contract, or to perform work as a subcontractor on a public works project pursuant to this section. The list shall contain the name of the contractor, the Contractors’ State License Board license number of the contractor, and the effective period of debarment of the contractor. Contractors shall be added to the list upon issuance of a debarment order and the commissioner shall also notify the Contractors’ State License Board when the list is updated. At least annually, the commissioner shall notify awarding bodies of the availability of the list of debarred contractors.

(l) (1) If a public entity or
 awarding body that is required to obtain an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete a contract or project receives a monthly report which does not demonstrate compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 10506.6, Section 10506.8, Section 10506.9, or subdivision (c) of Section 20928.2 of this code, Article 9 (commencing with Section 388) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 66201 of the Government Code, the public entity or awarding body shall forward a copy of the monthly report to the Labor Commissioner for issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment in accordance with this section.

(2) The penalty and debarment procedures of this section shall apply to violations of subdivision (c) of Section 10506.6, Section 10506.8, Section 10506.9, or subdivision (c) of Section 20928.2 of this code, Article 9 (commencing with Section 388) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 66201 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 882, Sec. 3.   (AB 3018)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

On or before July 1, 2025, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall create and maintain a public online database to verify that a worker graduated from a California apprenticeship program. The database shall be searchable by using the first name, last name, and graduation date of the worker.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 882, Sec. 2.   (SB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Formation [3000. - 3505.]



  ARTICLE 1. Roofing Projects [3000. - 3010.]

3000.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Architect” means an architect who has a current license issued by the state.

(b) “District” means a school district with an average daily attendance greater than 2,500 or a community college district.

(c) “Engineer” means an engineer who has a current license issued by the state.

(d) “Public facility” means a public school or community college.

(e) “Roofing consultant” means a consultant who is registered by RCI (formerly Roof Consultants Institute).

(f) “Roof project” means a project for the replacement or repair of a roof of a public facility, except that “roof project” does not include a project for the repair of 25 percent or less of the roof or a repair project that has a total cost of twenty-one thousand dollars ($21,000) or less.

(g) “Substitute” or “substitution” means a material, product, thing, or service proposed by a bidder to be an adequate substitute material, product, thing, or service that is equal to an item designated
 in specifications, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3400 and subdivision (a) of Section 10129.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 3400 and subdivision (a) of Section 10129, for any roof project, a material, product, thing, or service shall be considered equal if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The item is at least equal in quality, durability, design, and appearance but not necessarily of an identical color.

(2) The item will perform the intended function at least equally well.

(3) The item conforms substantially, even with deviations, to the detailed requirements contained in the specifications.

(b) A substitute may be unequal if the resulting roof system would be substantially different than other equal or better systems in terms of performance and durability, but not merely different by virtue of the inclusion of proprietary products or a proprietary warranty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

Specifications for any roof project shall be designed to promote competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

(a) (1) An architect, engineer, or roofing consultant who provides professional services related to a roof project shall disclose any financial relationships by completing and signing the certification set forth in subdivision (b) prior to the time professional services are engaged. A materials manufacturer, contractor, or vendor involved in a bid or proposal for a roof project shall disclose any financial relationships by completing and
 signing the certification set forth in subdivision (b) when the award is made. The architect, engineer, roofing consultant, materials manufacturer, contractor, or vendor shall provide the certification to the district.

(2) An architect, engineer, roofing consultant, materials manufacturer, contractor, or vendor shall not disclose a financial relationship in which that person or entity is a stockholder of a corporation the stock of which is listed for sale to the general public on a national securities exchange and registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, if the person or entity holds less than 10 percent of the outstanding stock entitled to vote at the annual meeting of the corporation.

(3) An architect, contractor, engineer, materials manufacturer, roofing consultant, or vendor who knowingly provides false information or fails to disclose a financial
 relationship pursuant to this section shall be liable to the district for any costs to the district that are reasonably attributable to excess or unnecessary costs, when compared to competing bids, incurred by the district as a result of the undisclosed financial relationship.

(b) I, Name, Name of Employer, certify that I have not offered, given, or agreed to give, received, accepted, or agreed to accept, any gift, contribution, or any financial incentive whatsoever to or from any person in connection with the roof project contract. As used in this certification, “person” means any natural person, business, partnership, corporation, union, committee, club, or other organization, entity, or group of individuals. Furthermore, I,
 Name, Name of Employer, certify that I do not have, and throughout the duration of the contract, I will not have, any financial relationship in connection with the performance of this contract with any architect, engineer, roofing consultant, materials manufacturer, distributor, or vendor that is not disclosed below.

I, Name, Name of Employer, have the following financial relationships with an architect, engineer, roofing consultant, materials manufacturer, distributor, or vendor, or other person in connection with the following roof project contract:Name and Address of Building, Contract Date and Number

I certify that to the best of my knowledge, the contents of this disclosure are true, or are believed to be true.

SignatureDate

Print Name

 Print Name of Employer

(c) Any person who knowingly provides false information or fails to disclose a financial relationship in the disclosure
 set forth in subdivision (b) shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), in addition to any other available remedies. An action for a civil penalty under this provision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

(a) To report bid rigging involving local government agencies and employees, including, but not limited to, county, city, and school district employees and officials, an interested person may contact the Antitrust Law Section of the Office of the Attorney General, 300 S. Spring St., Ste. 1702, Los Angeles, CA 90013, (800) 952-5225, or fill out the online complaint form on the Internet Web site of the Office of the Attorney General (Consumer Complaint Against a
 Business/Company) at ag.ca.gov/contact/complaint_form.php?cmplt=CL.

(b) To file a complaint regarding improper bidding involving state funding, an interested person may contact the Bureau of State Audits Whistleblower Hotline for any state agency or institution, at 800-952-5665, or by mail at 555 Capitol Mall, Suite 300, Sacramento, CA 95814.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

This article shall not apply to a school district operating in accordance with Section 20113 or a community college district operating in accordance with Section 20654.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 635)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bidders [3300. - 3300.]

3300.

(a) Any public entity, as defined in Section 1100, the University of California, and the California State University shall specify the classification of the contractor’s license which a contractor shall possess at the time a contract is awarded. The specification shall be included in any plans prepared for a public project and in any notice inviting bids required pursuant to this code. 

This requirement shall apply only with respect to contractors who contract directly with the public entity.

(b) A contractor who is not awarded a public contract because of the failure of an entity, as defined in subdivision (a), to comply with that subdivision shall not receive damages for the loss of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1073, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Preference for Materials [3400. - 3410.]

3400.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of this section to encourage contractors and manufacturers to develop and implement new and ingenious materials, products, and services that function as well, in all essential respects, as materials, products, and services that are required by a contract, but at a lower cost to taxpayers.

(b) No agency of the state, nor any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or district, nor any public officer or person charged with the letting of contracts for the construction, alteration, or repair of public works, shall draft or cause to be drafted specifications for bids, in connection with the construction, alteration, or repair of public works, (1) in a manner that limits the bidding, directly or indirectly, to any one specific concern, or (2) calling for a designated material, product, thing, or service by specific brand or trade name unless the specification is followed by the words “or equal” so that bidders may furnish any equal material, product, thing, or service. In applying this section, the specifying agency shall, if aware of an equal product manufactured in this state, name that product in the specification. Specifications shall provide a period of time prior to or after, or prior to and after, the award of the contract for
 submission of data substantiating a request for a substitution of “an equal” item. If no time period is specified, data may be submitted any time within 35 days after the award of the contract.

(c) Subdivision (b) is not applicable if the awarding authority, or its designee, makes a finding that is described in the invitation for bids or request for proposals that a particular material, product, thing, or service is designated by specific brand or trade name for any of the following purposes:

(1) In order that a field test or experiment may be made to determine the product’s suitability for future use.

(2) In order to match other products in use on a particular public improvement either completed or in the course of completion.

(3) In order to obtain a
 necessary item that is only available from one source.

(4) (A) In order to respond to an emergency declared by a local agency, but only if the declaration is approved by a four-fifths vote of the governing board of the local agency issuing the invitation for bid or request for proposals.

(B) In order to respond to an emergency declared by the state, a state agency, or political subdivision of the state, but only if the facts setting forth the reasons for the finding of the emergency are contained in the public records of the authority issuing the invitation for bid or request for proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (AB 1086)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3410.

Any public entity, as defined in Section 1100, including any school district or community college district, when purchasing food, shall give preference to United States-grown produce and United States-processed foods when there is a choice and it is economically feasible to do so. For purposes of this section, the determination of “economically feasible” shall be made by the purchasing public entity, considering the total cost, quantity, and quality of the food and the budget and policies of the entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Buy Clean California Act [3500. - 3505.]

3500.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Buy Clean California Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   (AB 262)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3501.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Awarding authority” means any of the following:

(1) A state agency for a contract for a public works project that is subject to the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2).

(2) The Regents of the University of California for a contract for a public works project that is subject to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 10500) of Part 2.

(3) The Trustees of the California State University for a contract for a public works project
 that is subject to the California State University Contract Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10700) of Part 2).

(b) “Department” means the Department of General Services.

(c) “Eligible materials” means any of the following:

(1) Carbon steel rebar.

(2) Flat glass.

(3) Insulation. 

(4) Structural steel.

(d) “Eligible project” means a project that the awarding authority determines will require eligible materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (SB 1207)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

(a) By January 1, 2022, the department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall establish, and publish in the State Contracting Manual or a department management memorandum, or make available on the department’s internet website, a maximum acceptable global warming potential for each category of eligible materials in accordance with both of the following requirements:

(1) The department shall set the maximum acceptable global warming potential at the industry average of facility-specific global warming potential emissions for that material with a phase-in period of not more than two years. The department shall determine the industry average by consulting recognized databases of environmental product declarations.
 If the department determines that the facility-specific environmental product declarations available do not adequately represent the industry as a whole, it may use industrywide environmental product declarations based on domestic production data in its calculation of the industry average. When determining the industry averages pursuant to this paragraph, the department should include all stages of manufacturing required by the relevant product category rule. However, when setting the initial industry average, the department may exclude emissions that occur during fabrication stages, and make reasonable judgments aligned with the product category rule.

(2) The department shall express the maximum acceptable global warming potential as a number that states the maximum acceptable facility-specific global warming potential for each category of eligible materials. The department may set different maximums
 for different products within each category and, when more than one set of product category rules exists for a category or set of products, may set a different maximum for each set of product category rules. The global warming potential shall be provided in a manner that is consistent with criteria in an Environmental Product Declaration.

(b) The department, by January 1, 2022, shall submit a report to the Legislature that describes the method that the department used to develop the maximum global warming potential for each category of eligible materials pursuant to subdivision (a). The report required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) By January 1, 2025, and every three years thereafter, the department shall review the maximum acceptable global warming potential for each category of eligible materials established pursuant to subdivision (a), and may adjust that number downward for any eligible material to reflect industry improvements if the department, based on the process described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), determines that the industry average has changed, but the department shall not adjust that number upward for any eligible material. At that time, the department shall update the State Contracting Manual, department management memorandum, or information available on the department’s internet website, to reflect that adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 23.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

(a) An awarding authority shall require the successful bidder for a contract described in subdivision (b) to submit a current facility-specific Environmental Product Declaration, Type III, as defined by the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) standard 14025, or similarly robust life cycle assessment methods that have uniform standards in data collection consistent with ISO standard 14025, industry acceptance, and integrity, for each eligible material proposed to be used.

(b) An awarding authority shall include in a specification for bids for an eligible project that the facility-specific global warming potential for any eligible material does not exceed the maximum acceptable global warming potential for that material determined pursuant to
 Section 3502. An awarding authority may include in a specification for bids for an eligible project a facility-specific global warming potential for any eligible material that is lower than the maximum acceptable global warming potential for that material determined pursuant to Section 3502.

(c) A successful bidder for a contract described in subdivision (b) shall not install any eligible materials on the project until that bidder submits a facility-specific Environmental Product Declaration for that material pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall only apply to a contract entered into on or after July 1, 2022.

(e) This section shall not apply to an eligible material for a particular contract if the awarding authority determines, upon written justification published on its internet website, that requiring those eligible materials to comply would be technically infeasible, would result in a significant increase in the project cost or a significant delay in completion, or would result in only one source or manufacturer being able to provide the type of material needed by the state.

(f) This section shall not apply if the awarding authority determines that an emergency exists, as defined in Section 1102, or that any of the circumstances described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 10122 exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 24.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.

In carrying out its duties under this article, an awarding authority shall strive to achieve a continuous reduction of emissions over time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   (AB 262)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

The department, by July 1, 2023, shall submit a report to the Legislature on any obstacles to the implementation of this article, and the effectiveness of this article to reduce global warming potential. The report required by this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 25.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Subletting and Subcontracting [4100. - 4114.]

4100.

This chapter may be cited as the “Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

The Legislature finds that the practices of bid shopping and bid peddling in connection with the construction, alteration, and repair of public improvements often result in poor quality of material and workmanship to the detriment of the public, deprive the public of the full benefits of fair competition among prime contractors and subcontractors, and lead to insolvencies, loss of wages to employees, and other evils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

Nothing in this chapter limits or diminishes any rights or remedies, either legal or equitable, which:

(a) An original or substituted subcontractor may have against the prime contractor, his or her successors or assigns.

(b) The state or any county, city, body politic, or public agency may have against the prime contractor, his or her successors or assigns, including the right to take over and complete the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

Any officer, department, board, or commission taking bids for the construction of any public work or improvement shall provide in the specifications prepared for the work or improvement or in the general conditions under which bids will be received for the doing of the work incident to the public work or improvement that any person making a bid or offer to perform the work, shall, in his or her bid or offer, set forth:

(a) (1) The name, the location of the place of business, the California contractor license number, and public works contractor registration number issued pursuant to Section 1725.5 of the Labor Code of each subcontractor who will perform work or labor or render service to the prime contractor in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or
 a subcontractor licensed by the State of California who, under subcontract to the prime contractor, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications, in an amount in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the prime contractor’s total bid or, in the case of bids or offers for the construction of streets or highways, including bridges, in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the prime contractor’s total bid or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.

(2) An inadvertent error in listing the California contractor license number or public works contractor registration number provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be grounds for filing a bid protest or grounds for considering the bid nonresponsive if the corrected contractor’s license number is submitted to the public entity by the prime contractor within 24 hours after the bid opening and
 provided the corrected contractor’s license number corresponds to the submitted name and location for that subcontractor.

(3) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), any information requested by the officer, department, board, or commission concerning any subcontractor who the prime contractor is required to list under this subdivision, other than the subcontractor’s name, location of business, the California contractor license number, and the public works contractor registration number, may be submitted by the prime contractor up to 24 hours after the deadline established by the officer, department, board, or commission for receipt of bids by prime contractors.

(B) A state or local agency may implement subparagraph (A) at its option.

(b) The portion of the work that will be done by each subcontractor
 under this act. The prime contractor shall list only one subcontractor for each portion as is defined by the prime contractor in his or her bid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 90.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.5.

(a) The officer, department, board, or commission taking bids for construction of any public work or improvement shall specify in the bid invitation and public notice the place the bids of the prime contractors are to be received and the time by which they shall be received. The date and time shall be extended by no less than 72 hours if the officer, department, board, or commission issues any material changes, additions, or deletions to the invitation later than 72 hours prior to the bid closing. Any bids received after the time specified
 in the notice or any extension due to material changes shall be returned unopened.

(b) As used in this section, the term “material change” means a change with a substantial cost impact on the total bid as determined by the awarding agency.

(c) As used in this section, the term “bid invitation” shall include any documents issued to prime contractors that contain descriptions of the work to be bid or the content, form, or manner of submission of bids by bidders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

Circumvention by a general contractor who bids as a prime contractor of the requirement under Section 4104 for him or her to list his or her subcontractors, by the device of listing another contractor who will in turn sublet portions constituting the majority of the work covered by the prime contract, shall be considered a violation of this chapter and shall subject that prime contractor to the penalties set forth in Sections 4110 and 4111.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

If a prime contractor fails to specify a subcontractor or if a prime contractor specifies more than one subcontractor for the same portion of work to be performed under the contract in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the prime contractor’s total bid, the prime contractor agrees that he or she is fully qualified to perform that portion himself or herself, and that the prime contractor shall perform that portion himself or herself.

If after award of contract, the prime contractor subcontracts, except as provided for in Sections 4107 or 4109, any such portion of the work, the prime contractor shall be subject to
 the penalties named in Section 4111.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.1.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

A prime contractor whose bid is accepted may not:

(a) Substitute a person as subcontractor in place of the subcontractor listed in the original bid, except that the awarding authority, or its duly authorized officer, may, except as otherwise provided in Section 4107.5, consent to the substitution of another person as a subcontractor in any of the following
 situations:

(1) When the subcontractor listed in the bid, after having had a reasonable opportunity to do so, fails or refuses to execute a written contract for the scope of work specified in the subcontractor’s bid and at the price specified in the subcontractor’s bid, when that written contract, based upon the general terms, conditions, plans, and specifications for the project involved or the terms of that subcontractor’s written bid, is presented to the subcontractor by the prime contractor.

(2) When the listed subcontractor becomes insolvent or the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy.

(3) When the listed subcontractor fails or refuses to perform his or her subcontract.

(4) When the listed subcontractor fails or refuses to meet the bond
 requirements of the prime contractor as set forth in Section 4108.

(5) When the prime contractor demonstrates to the awarding authority, or its duly authorized officer, subject to the further provisions set forth in Section 4107.5, that the name of the subcontractor was listed as the result of an inadvertent clerical error.

(6) When the listed subcontractor is not licensed pursuant to the Contractors License Law.

(7) When the awarding authority, or its duly authorized officer, determines that the work performed by the listed subcontractor is substantially unsatisfactory and not in substantial accordance with the plans and specifications, or that the subcontractor is substantially delaying or disrupting the progress of the work.

(8) When the listed